Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6083.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 205c. (1) A zoning ordinance must not restrict the use of a non-fire rated window in an accessory dwelling unit if the window of the accessory dwelling unit is more than 12 feet from all other structures. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Accessory dwelling unit" means a secondary dwelling unit, whether constructed on-site or off-site, that is incidental to another dwelling unit located on the same parcel of real property. (b) "Non-fire rated window" means a window that has not been tested, certified, or rated by an independent laboratory to withstand fire exposure for a specific duration.